Wyoming, session 2025, HB0114.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-4-116 is created to read:

35-4-116. Public health emergencies; religious
assembly exemptions.

HB0114

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0393
(a) For any order, rule, regulation, policy or
directive issued during a public health emergency as
defined by W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i) that requires the closure of
or otherwise limits a business or other entity from
remaining open and that exempts, in whole or in part, any
business or entity from those closure requirements or
limitations, the order, rule, regulation, policy or
directive shall provide the same exemption to:

(i) Any place of worship qualifying as an exempt
organization for religious purposes under section 501(c)(3)
of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

(ii) Churches, their integrated auxiliaries and
conventions or associations of churches;

(iii) Any gathering for religious assembly in
any place otherwise open for religious assembly, including
those taking place in private residences and public places.

(b) This section shall be construed to afford to
religious institutions, places of worship and religious
assemblies the same degree of freedom to meet during public
HB0114

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0393
health emergencies as is afforded to any business or entity
that is exempted from closure requirements implemented
during a public health emergency.

(c) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this
section may bring a civil action for relief in any court of
competent jurisdiction. A court may, for an act or practice
that violates this section:

(i) Award damages, costs and attorney fees;

(ii) Issue a declaratory judgment for or enjoin
an act or practice that violates this section;

(iii) Award exemplary or punitive damages, if
the act or practice that violates this section was wanton
or malicious.

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-104(a), 1-39-118(d) and
1-42-202(f) are amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.
HB0114

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0393

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112, 1‑39‑122, and 1-39-123 and
35-4-116. Any immunity in actions based on a contract
entered into by a governmental entity is waived except to
the extent provided by the contract if the contract was
within the powers granted to the entity and was properly
executed and except as provided in W.S. 1-39-120(b). The
claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply to contractual
claims against governmental entities.

1-39-118. Maximum liability; insurance authorized.

(d) Except as provided by W.S. 35-4-116, no judgment
against a governmental entity shall include an award for
exemplary or punitive damages, for interest prior to
judgments or for attorney's fees.

1-42-202. Local government self-insurance program;
creation; authorized payments.

HB0114

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0393
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act
and except as provided by W.S. 35-4-116, no expenditure
shall be made from the program in any action to pay any
claim or final judgment for exemplary or punitive damages.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0114